Utah statutes.
9-8-204.   Board of State History.

(1)  There is created within the department the Board of State History.

(2)  The board shall consist of 11 members appointed by the governor with the consent of the Senate as follows:

(a)  sufficient representatives to satisfy the federal requirements for an adequately qualified State Historic Preservation Review Board; and

(b)  other persons with an interest in the subject matter of the division's responsibilities.

(3) (a)  Except as required by Subsection (3)(b), the members shall be appointed for terms of four years and shall serve until their successors are appointed and qualified.

(b)  Notwithstanding the requirements of Subsection (3)(a), the governor shall, at the time of appointment or reappointment, adjust the length of terms to ensure that the terms of board members are staggered so that approximately half of the board is appointed every two years.

(4)  When a vacancy occurs in the membership for any reason, the replacement shall be appointed for the unexpired term with the consent of the Senate.

(5)  Six members of the board are a quorum for the transaction of business.

(6)  The governor shall select a chair and vice chair from the board members.

(7)  A member may not receive compensation or benefits for the member's service, but may receive per diem and travel expenses in accordance with:

(a)  Section 63A-3-106;

(b)  Section 63A-3-107; and

(c)  rules made by the Division of Finance pursuant to Sections 63A-3-106 and 63A-3-107.



Amended by Chapter 286, 2010 General Session

